Montana, session 2025, HB460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Article II, section 20, of The Constitution of the State of Montana is amended to read:
"Section 20. Initiation of proceedings. (1) Criminal offenses within the jurisdiction of any court
inferior to the district court shall be prosecuted by complaint. All criminal actions in district court, except those
on appeal, shall be prosecuted either by information, after examination and commitment by a magistrate or
after leave granted by the court, or by indictment without such examination, commitment or leave.
(2) (a) A grand jury shall consist of eleven persons, of whom eight must concur to find an
indictment. A grand jury shall be drawn and summoned only at the discretion and order of the district judge.
(b) Whenever 100 plus one-half of one percent of the registered electors of a county have signed a
petition to summon a grand jury and have submitted the petition signatures to the county election administrator,
a grand jury shall be summoned and impaneled by the judge of the district court for the county receiving the
petition.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 460

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 460.1
(3) A grand jury so summoned and impaneled shall first consider any cause advanced by those
who have brought and signed the petition, but the grand jury is the sole judge of its own duration and the
breadth and depth of its own inquiry.
(4) An indictment brought by a grand jury shall be prosecuted by the county attorney for the county
in which an alleged offense occurred, regardless of prosecutorial discretion. A county attorney who fails to
prosecute within 90 days after an indictment is handed down by the grand jury may be indicted for obstruction
of justice and official misconduct.
(5) If a grand jury summoned under this section is unable to obtain the prosecution of an
indictment by the county attorney of the county where the alleged offense occurred, the grand jury may compel
prosecutorial assistance from the attorney general, or the grand jury may retain a private prosecutor whose
fees shall be a lawful claim against the county where the alleged offense occurred.
(6) A grand jury summoned under this section may, in addition to indictments, seek court orders to
remedy situations under its investigation and may hire counsel independent of the county attorney’s office."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
☐ YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
☐ NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on approval by the electorate.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 460